California, session 20252026, AB1082.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2729 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2729. Nursing services A student may be rendered by a student when these services render nursing services if those services are incidental to the course of study of one of the following:(a) A student enrolled in a board-approved prelicensure program or school of nursing.(b) A nurse licensed in another state or country taking a board-approved continuing education course or a postlicensure course.(c) (1) A student who is a resident of the state and enrolled in a prelicensure distance education nursing program based at an out-of-state private postsecondary educational institution for the purpose of gaining clinical experience in a clinical setting that meets all of the following criteria:(A) The program is accredited by a programmatic accreditation entity recognized by the United States Department of Education.(B) The board does not otherwise approve the program.(C) The student placement does not impact any students already assigned to the agency or facility.(D) The program does not make payments to any clinical agency or facility in exchange for clinical experience placements for students enrolled in a nursing program offered by or affiliated with the institution or private postsecondary school of nursing.(E) The program qualifies graduates for licensure under this chapter.(F) The program maintains minimum faculty to student ratios required of board-approved programs for inperson clinical experiences.(G) The program pays a one-time fee of one hundred dollars ($100) to the board for each student under this subdivision who participates in clinical experience placements in the state.(2) A student described by this subdivision shall be supervised in person by a registered nurse licensed by the board pursuant to this chapter while rendering nursing services.(3) A clinical agency or facility shall not offer clinical experience placements to an out-of-state private postsecondary educational institution if the placements are needed to fulfill the clinical experience requirements of an in-state student enrolled in a board-approved nursing program.(4) For purposes of this subdivision, “out-of-state private postsecondary educational institution” has the same meaning as defined in Section 94850.5 of the Education Code.